Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.123, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Terms. Following each apportionment of council districts, as provided under subdivision 3a, council members must be appointed from newly drawn districts as provided in subdivision 3a. Each council member, other than the chair, must reside in the council district represented. Each council district must be represented by one member of the council. The terms of members end with the term of the governor, except that all terms expire on the effective date of the next apportionment. A member serves at the pleasure of the governornew text begin and can be removed for cause, after notice and hearingnew text end . A member shall continue to serve the member's district until a successor is appointed and qualified; except that, following each apportionment, the member shall continue to serve at large until the governor appoints 16 council members, one from each of the newly drawn council districts as provided under subdivision 3a, to serve terms as provided under this section. The appointment to the council must be made by the first Monday in March of the year in which the term ends.new text begin An individual may serve no more than 12 years as a member of the council.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.123, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Chair;new text begin vice-chair;new text end appointment, officers, selection; duties and compensation. (a) The chair of the Metropolitan Council shall be appointed by the governor as the 17th voting member thereof by and with the advice and consent of the senate to serve at the pleasure of the governor to represent the metropolitan area at large. Senate confirmation shall be as provided by section 15.066. The chair of the Metropolitan Council shall, if present, preside at meetings of the council, have the primary responsibility for meeting with local elected officials, serve as the principal legislative liaison, present to the governor and the legislature, after council approval, the council's plans for regional governance and operations, serve as the principal spokesperson of the council, and perform other duties assigned by the council or by law. (b) new text begin The vice-chair of the Metropolitan Council shall be appointed by the governor from the 16 members appointed under subdivision 3. new text end The Metropolitan Council shall elect other officers as it deems necessary for the conduct of its affairs for a one-year term. A secretary and treasurer need not be members of the Metropolitan Council. Meeting times and places shall be fixed by the Metropolitan Council and special meetings may be called by a majority of the members of the Metropolitan Council or by the chair. The chairnew text begin , vice chair,new text end and each Metropolitan Council member shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses. (c) Each member of the council shall attend and participate in council meetings and meet regularly with local elected officials and legislative members from the council member's district. Each council member shall serve on at least one division committee for transportation, environment, or community development. (d) In the performance of its duties the Metropolitan Council may adopt policies and procedures governing its operation, establish committees, and, when specifically authorized by law, make appointments to other governmental agencies and districts. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.123, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Salary; benefits. new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2026, each member of the council shall receive an annual salary of $40,000. The salary under this subdivision must be increased at the same percentage and time as legislator salaries, as prescribed by the Legislative Salary Council under section 15A.0825. Each member of the council must also be offered retirement and other employment benefits comparable to Metropolitan Council employees under section 473.129, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.125, is amended to read: 473.125 REGIONAL ADMINISTRATOR. The Metropolitan Council shall appoint a regional administrator to serve at the council's pleasure as the principal administrative officer for the Metropolitan Council. The regional administrator shall organize the work of the council staff. The regional administrator shall appoint on the basis of merit and fitness, and discipline and discharge all employees in accordance with the council's personnel policy, except the general counsel, as provided in section 473.123, subdivision 8. The regional administrator must ensure that all policy decisions of the council are carried out. The regional administrator shall attend meetings of the council and may take part in discussions but may not vote. The regional administrator shall recommend to the council for adoption measures deemed necessary for efficient administration of the council, keep the council fully apprised of the financial condition of the council, and prepare and submit an annual budget to the council for approval. The regional administrator shall prepare and submit for approval by the council an administrative code organizing and codifying the policies of the council, and perform other duties as prescribed by the council. The regional administrator may be chosen from among the citizens of the nation at large, and shall be selected on the basis of training and experience in public administration.new text begin The regional administrator is subject to annual performance reviews by the council.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end